Utah statutes.
16-10a-853.   Shareholders' action.
(1)  Shareholders' action respecting a transaction is effective for purposes
of Subsection 16-10a-851(2)(b) if a quorum existed pursuant to Subsection (2)
and a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by holders of qualified shares
present in person or by proxy at the meeting were cast in favor of the
transaction after notice to shareholders describing the director's conflicting
interest transaction, provision of the information referred to in Subsection
(3), and required disclosure to the shareholders who voted on the transaction,
to the extent the information was not known by them.
(2)  A majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the holders of all
qualified shares constitutes a quorum for purposes of action that complies
with this section.  Subject to the provisions of Subsections (3) and (4),
shareholders' action that otherwise complies with this section is not affected
by the presence of holders of, or the voting of, shares that are not qualified
shares.
(3)  For purposes of compliance with Subsection (1), a director who has a
conflicting interest respecting the transaction shall, before the shareholders
vote, inform the secretary or other officer or agent of the corporation
authorized to tabulate votes of the number and the identity of persons holding
or controlling the vote, of all shares that the director knows are
beneficially owned, or the voting of which is controlled, by the director or
by a related person of the director, or both.
(4)  If a shareholders' vote does not comply with Subsection (1) solely
because of a failure of a director to comply with Subsection (3), and if the
director establishes that the failure did not determine and was not intended
by him to influence the outcome of the vote, the court may, with or without
further proceedings under Subsection 16-10a-851(2)(c), take any action
respecting the transaction and the director, and give any effect to the
shareholders' vote, as it considers appropriate in the circumstances.
